Missouri, session 2026, SB1054.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Sections 104.1091 and 105.915, RSMo, are
2 repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be
3 known as sections 104.1091 and 105.915, to read as follows:
1 104.1091. 1. Notwithstanding any provision of the
2 year 2000 plan to the contrary, each person who first
3 becomes an employee on or after January 1, 2011, shall be a
4 member of the year 2000 plan subject to the provisions of
5 this section.
6 2. A member's normal retirement eligibility shall be
7 as follows:
8 (1) The member's attainment of at least age sixty-
9 seven and the completion of at least ten years of credited
10 service; or the member's attainment of at least age fifty-
11 five with the sum of the member's age and credited service
12 equaling at least ninety; or, in the case of a member who is
13 serving as a uniformed member of the highway patrol and
14 subject to the mandatory retirement provisions of section
15 104.081, such member's attainment of at least age sixty or
16 the attainment of at least age fifty-five with ten years of
17 credited service;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1054 2
18 (2) For members of the general assembly, the member's
19 attainment of at least age sixty-two and the completion of
20 at least three full biennial assemblies; or the member's
21 attainment of at least age fifty-five with the sum of the
22 member's age and credited service equaling at least ninety;
23 (3) For statewide elected officials, the official's
24 attainment of at least age sixty-two and the completion of
25 at least four years of credited service; or the official's
26 attainment of at least age fifty-five with the sum of the
27 official's age and credited service equaling at least ninety.
28 3. A vested former member's normal retirement
29 eligibility shall be based on the attainment of at least age
30 sixty-seven and the completion of at least ten years of
31 credited service.
32 4. A temporary annuity paid pursuant to subsection 4
33 of section 104.1024 shall be payable if the member has
34 attained at least age fifty-five with the sum of the
35 member's age and credited service equaling at least ninety;
36 or in the case of a member who is serving as a uniformed
37 member of the highway patrol and subject to the mandatory
38 retirement provisions of section 104.081, the temporary
39 annuity shall be payable if the member has attained at least
40 age sixty, or at least age fifty-five with ten years of
41 credited service.
42 5. A member, other than a member who is serving as a
43 uniformed member of the highway patrol and subject to the
44 mandatory retirement provisions of section 104.081, shall be
45 eligible for an early retirement annuity upon the attainment
46 of at least age sixty-two and the completion of at least ten
47 years of credited service. A vested former member who
48 terminated employment prior to the attainment of early

SB 1054 3
49 retirement eligibility shall not be eligible for early
50 retirement.
51 6. The provisions of subsection 6 of section 104.1021
52 and section 104.344 as applied pursuant to subsection 7 of
53 section 104.1021 and section 104.1090 shall not apply to
54 members covered by this section.
55 7. The minimum credited service requirements of five
56 years contained in sections 104.1018, 104.1030, 104.1036,
57 and 104.1051 shall be ten years for members covered by this
58 section. The normal and early retirement eligibility
59 requirements in this section shall apply for purposes of
60 administering section 104.1087.
61 8. A member shall be required to contribute four
62 percent of the member's pay to the retirement system, which
63 shall stand to the member's credit in his or her individual
64 account with the system, together with investment credits
65 thereon, for purposes of funding retirement benefits payable
66 under the year 2000 plan, subject to the following
67 provisions:
68 (1) The state of Missouri employer, pursuant to the
69 provisions of 26 U.S.C. Section 414(h)(2), shall pick up and
70 pay the contributions that would otherwise be payable by the
71 member under this section. The contributions so picked up
72 shall be treated as employer contributions for purposes of
73 determining the member's pay that is includable in the
74 member's gross income for federal income tax purposes;
75 (2) Member contributions picked up by the employer
76 shall be paid from the same source of funds used for the
77 payment of pay to a member. A deduction shall be made from
78 each member's pay equal to the amount of the member's
79 contributions picked up by the employer. This deduction,
80 however, shall not reduce the member's pay for purposes of

SB 1054 4
81 computing benefits under the retirement system pursuant to
82 this chapter;
83 (3) Member contributions so picked up shall be
84 credited to a separate account within the member's
85 individual account so that the amounts contributed pursuant
86 to this section may be distinguished from the amounts
87 contributed on an after-tax basis;
88 (4) The contributions, although designated as employee
89 contributions, shall be paid by the employer in lieu of the
90 contributions by the member. The member shall not have the
91 option of choosing to receive the contributed amounts
92 directly instead of having them paid by the employer to the
93 retirement system;
94 (5) Interest shall be credited annually on June
95 thirtieth based on the value in the account as of July first
96 of the immediately preceding year at a rate of four
97 percent. Effective June 30, 2014, and each June thirtieth
98 thereafter, the interest crediting rate shall be equal to
99 the investment rate that is published by the United States
100 Department of the Treasury, or its successor agency, for
101 fifty-two week treasury bills for the relevant auction that
102 is nearest to the preceding July first, or a successor
103 treasury bill investment rate as approved by the board if
104 the fifty-two week treasury bill is no longer issued.
105 Interest credits shall cease upon termination of employment
106 if the member is not a vested former member. Otherwise,
107 interest credits shall cease upon retirement or death;
108 (6) (a) A vested former member or a former member who
109 is not vested may request a refund of his or her
110 contributions and interest credited thereon. If such member
111 is married at the time of such request, such request shall
112 not be processed without consent from the spouse. Such

SB 1054 5
113 member is not eligible to request a refund if such member's
114 retirement benefit is subject to a division of benefit order
115 pursuant to section 104.1051. [Such refund]
116 (b) For a former member who is not vested, the system
117 shall refund the former member's contributions and interest
118 credited thereon if the total amount thereof is one thousand
119 dollars or less, or such other amount as may be permitted
120 under applicable federal law, provided that:
121 a. The system's procedures in effect from time to time
122 to locate such member shall be considered reasonable and
123 necessary diligence consistent with good business practice,
124 such that if after the application of such procedures such
125 refund is returned to the system, the refund shall be
126 presumed to be abandoned property under sections 447.500 to
127 447.585 notwithstanding any provisions of those sections
128 which require a specific abandonment or dormancy period; and
129 b. Subsection 2 of section 104.620 shall not apply to
130 such refunds.
131 (c) Contribution refunds shall be paid by the system
132 within an administratively reasonable period, but no sooner
133 than ninety days from the date of termination of
134 employment. The amount refunded shall include all employee
135 contributions made to any retirement plan administered by
136 the system and interest credited thereon.
137 (d) A vested former member may not request a refund
138 after such member becomes eligible for normal retirement.
139 (e) A vested former member or a former member who is
140 not vested who receives a refund shall forfeit all the
141 member's credited service and future rights to receive
142 benefits from the system and shall not be eligible to
143 receive any disability benefits; provided that any member or
144 vested former member receiving disability benefits shall not

SB 1054 6
145 be eligible for a refund. If such member subsequently
146 becomes an employee and works continuously for at least one
147 year, the credited service previously forfeited shall be
148 restored if the member returns to the system the amount
149 previously refunded plus interest at a rate established by
150 the board;
151 (7) The beneficiary of any member who made
152 contributions shall receive a refund upon the member's death
153 equal to the amount, if any, of such contributions and
154 interest credited thereon less any retirement benefits
155 received by the member unless an annuity is payable to a
156 survivor or beneficiary as a result of the member's death.
157 In that event, the beneficiary of the survivor or
158 beneficiary who received the annuity shall receive a refund
159 upon the survivor's or beneficiary's death equal to the
160 amount, if any, of the member's contributions less any
161 annuity amounts received by the member and the survivor or
162 beneficiary.
163 9. The employee contribution rate, the benefits
164 provided under the year 2000 plan to members covered under
165 this section, and any other provision of the year 2000 plan
166 with regard to members covered under this section may be
167 altered, amended, increased, decreased, or repealed, but
168 only with respect to services rendered by the member after
169 the effective date of such alteration, amendment, increase,
170 decrease, or repeal, or, with respect to interest credits,
171 for periods of time after the effective date of such
172 alteration, amendment, increase, decrease, or repeal.
173 10. For purposes of members covered by this section,
174 the options under section 104.1027 shall be as follows:
175 Option 1.

SB 1054 7
176 A retiree's life annuity shall be reduced to a
177 certain percent of the annuity otherwise
178 payable. Such percent shall be eighty-eight and
179 one half percent adjusted as follows: if the
180 retiree's age on the annuity starting date is
181 younger than sixty-seven years, an increase of
182 three-tenths of one percent for each year the
183 retiree's age is younger than age sixty-seven
184 years; and if the beneficiary's age is younger
185 than the retiree's age on the annuity starting
186 date, a decrease of three-tenths of one percent
187 for each year of age difference; and if the
188 retiree's age is younger than the beneficiary's
189 age on the annuity starting date, an increase of
190 three-tenths of one percent for each year of age
191 difference; provided, after all adjustments the
192 option 1 percent cannot exceed ninety-four and
193 one quarter percent. Upon the retiree's death,
194 fifty percent of the retiree's reduced annuity
195 shall be paid to such beneficiary who was the
196 retiree's spouse on the annuity starting date or
197 as otherwise provided by subsection 5 of this
198 section.
199 Option 2.
200 A retiree's life annuity shall be reduced to a
201 certain percent of the annuity otherwise
202 payable. Such percent shall be eighty-one
203 percent adjusted as follows: if the retiree's
204 age on the annuity starting date is younger than
205 sixty-seven years, an increase of four-tenths of
206 one percent for each year the retiree's age is
207 younger than sixty-seven years; and if the

SB 1054 8
208 beneficiary's age is younger than the retiree's
209 age on the annuity starting date, a decrease of
210 five-tenths of one percent for each year of age
211 difference; and if the retiree's age is younger
212 than the beneficiary's age on the annuity
213 starting date, an increase of five-tenths of one
214 percent for each year of age difference;
215 provided, after all adjustments the option 2
216 percent cannot exceed eighty-seven and three
217 quarter percent. Upon the retiree's death one
218 hundred percent of the retiree's reduced annuity
219 shall be paid to such beneficiary who was the
220 retiree's spouse on the annuity starting date or
221 as otherwise provided by subsection 5 of this
222 section.
223 Option 3.
224 A retiree's life annuity shall be reduced to
225 ninety-three percent of the annuity otherwise
226 payable. If the retiree dies before having
227 received one hundred twenty monthly payments,
228 the reduced annuity shall be continued for the
229 remainder of the one hundred twenty-month period
230 to the retiree's designated beneficiary provided
231 that if there is no beneficiary surviving the
232 retiree, the present value of the remaining
233 annuity payments shall be paid as provided under
234 subsection 3 of section 104.620. If the
235 beneficiary survives the retiree but dies before
236 receiving the remainder of such one hundred
237 twenty monthly payments, the present value of
238 the remaining annuity payments shall be paid as
239 provided under subsection 3 of section 104.620.

SB 1054 9
240 Option 4.
241 A retiree's life annuity shall be reduced to
242 eighty-six percent of the annuity otherwise
243 payable. If the retiree dies before having
244 received one hundred eighty monthly payments,
245 the reduced annuity shall be continued for the
246 remainder of the one hundred eighty-month period
247 to the retiree's designated beneficiary provided
248 that if there is no beneficiary surviving the
249 retiree, the present value of the remaining
250 annuity payments shall be paid as provided under
251 subsection 3 of section 104.620. If the
252 beneficiary survives the retiree but dies before
253 receiving the remainder of such one hundred
254 eighty monthly payments, the present value of
255 the remaining annuity payments shall be paid as
256 provided under subsection 3 of section 104.620.
257 11. The provisions of subsection 6 of section 104.1024
258 shall not apply to members covered by this section.
259 12. Effective January 1, 2018, a member who is not a
260 statewide elected official or a member of the general
261 assembly shall be eligible for retirement under this
262 subsection subject to the following conditions:
263 (1) A member's normal retirement eligibility shall be
264 based on the attainment of at least age sixty-seven and the
265 completion of at least five years of credited service; or
266 the member's attainment of at least age fifty-five with the
267 sum of the member's age and credited service equaling at
268 least ninety; or in the case of a member who is serving as a
269 uniformed member of the highway patrol and subject to the
270 mandatory retirement provisions of section 104.081, such
271 member's attainment of at least age sixty or the attainment

SB 1054 10
272 of at least age fifty-five with five years of credited
273 service;
274 (2) A vested former member's normal retirement
275 eligibility shall be based on the attainment of at least age
276 sixty-seven and the completion of at least five years of
277 credited service; except that, a vested former member who
278 terminates employment after the attainment of normal
279 retirement eligibility as described in subdivision (1) of
280 this subsection shall be covered under such subdivision;
281 (3) A temporary annuity paid under subsection 4 of
282 section 104.1024 shall be payable if the member has attained
283 at least age fifty-five with the sum of the member's age and
284 credited service equaling at least ninety; or in the case of
285 a member who is serving as a uniformed member of the highway
286 patrol and subject to the mandatory retirement provisions of
287 section 104.081, the temporary annuity shall be payable if
288 the member has attained at least age sixty, or at least age
289 fifty-five with five years of credited service;
290 (4) A member, other than a member who is serving as a
291 uniformed member of the highway patrol and subject to the
292 mandatory retirement provisions of section 104.081, shall be
293 eligible for an early retirement annuity upon the attainment
294 of at least age sixty-two and the completion of at least
295 five years of credited service. A vested former member who
296 terminated employment prior to the attainment of early
297 retirement eligibility shall not be eligible for early
298 retirement;
299 (5) The normal and early retirement eligibility
300 requirements in this subsection shall apply for purposes of
301 administering section 104.1087;
302 (6) The survivor annuity payable under section
303 104.1030 for vested former members who terminated employment

SB 1054 11
304 prior to the attainment of early retirement eligibility and
305 who are covered by this section shall not be payable until
306 the deceased member would have reached his or her normal
307 retirement eligibility under this subsection;
308 (7) The annual cost-of-living adjustment payable under
309 section 104.1045 shall not commence until the second
310 anniversary of the annuity starting date for vested former
311 members who terminated employment prior to the attainment of
312 early retirement eligibility and who are covered by this
313 subsection;
314 (8) The unused sick leave credit granted under
315 subsection 2 of section 104.1021 shall not apply to members
316 covered by this subsection unless the member terminates
317 employment after reaching normal retirement eligibility or
318 becoming eligible for an early retirement annuity under this
319 subsection; and
320 (9) The minimum credited service requirements of five
321 years contained in sections 104.1018, 104.1030, 104.1036,
322 and 104.1051 shall be five years for members covered by this
323 subsection.
1 105.915. 1. The board of trustees of the Missouri
2 state employees' retirement system shall administer the
3 deferred compensation fund for the employees of the state of
4 Missouri that was previously administered by the deferred
5 compensation commission, as established in section 105.910,
6 prior to August 28, 2007. The board shall be vested with
7 the same powers that it has under chapter 104 to enable it
8 and its officers, employees, and agents to administer the
9 fund under sections 105.900 to 105.927.
10 2. Except as provided in this subsection,
11 participation in such plan shall be by a specific written
12 agreement between state employees and the state, which shall

SB 1054 12
13 provide for the deferral of such amounts of compensation as
14 requested by the employee subject to any limitations imposed
15 under federal law. Participating employees must authorize
16 that such deferrals be made from their wages for the purpose
17 of participation in such program. An election to defer
18 compensation shall be made before the beginning of the
19 [month in] payroll period for which the compensation is
20 paid. Contributions shall be made for payroll periods
21 [occurring on or after the first day of the month] beginning
22 after the election is made.
23 3. Each employee eligible to participate in the plan
24 hired or rehired on or after July 1, 2012, shall be enrolled
25 in the plan automatically and his or her employer shall, in
26 accordance with the plan document, withhold and contribute
27 to the plan an amount equal to one percent of eligible
28 compensation received on and after the date of hire, unless
29 the employee elects not to participate in the plan within
30 the first thirty days of employment, and in that event, any
31 amounts contributed and earnings thereon will be refunded by
32 the plan to the employee pursuant to the procedure contained
33 in the plan documents. Employees who are employed by a
34 state college or university shall not be automatically
35 enrolled but may elect to participate in the plan and make
36 contributions in accordance with the terms of the plan.
37 4. Effective July 1, 2027:
38 (1) The plan document shall provide for automatic
39 increases in the deferral amount contributed by a
40 participating employee commencing with the first payroll
41 period following the employee's one year anniversary date of
42 employment or re-employment, whichever is later. The
43 deferral amount shall increase annually by one-half of one
44 percent until the amount reaches ten percent of the

SB 1054 13
45 employee's eligible compensation or the limitation imposed
46 under federal law, whichever is less.
47 (2) Each employee eligible to participate in the plan
48 who was last hired or rehired on or after July 1, 2012, and
49 before July 1, 2027, who was automatically enrolled in the
50 plan pursuant to subsection 3 of this section, and whose
51 contribution is equal to one percent of eligible
52 compensation on the effective date, shall be enrolled in
53 such automatic increases.
54 (3) Each employee eligible to participate in the plan
55 who was last hired or rehired on or after July 1, 2027,
56 shall be enrolled in such automatic increases.
57 5. Employees who are enrolled automatically or whose
58 deferral amounts are automatically increased may elect to
59 change the contribution rate in accordance with the terms of
60 the plan. Employees who elect not to participate in the
61 plan may at a later date elect to participate in the plan
62 and make contributions in accordance with the terms of the
63 plan. All assets and income of such fund shall be held in
64 trust by the board for the exclusive benefit of participants
65 and their beneficiaries. Assets of such trust, and the
66 trust established pursuant to section 105.927, may be pooled
67 solely for investment management purposes with assets of the
68 trust established under section 104.320.
69 [3.] 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of
70 sections 105.900 to 105.927, funds held for the state by the
71 board in accordance with written deferred compensation
72 agreements between the state and participating employees may
73 be invested in such investments as are deemed appropriate by
74 the board. All administrative costs of the program
75 described in this section, including staffing and overhead
76 expenses, may be paid out of assets of the fund, which may

SB 1054 14
77 reduce the amount due participants in the fund. Such
78 investments shall not be construed to be a prohibited use of
79 the general assets of the state.
80 [4.] 7. Investments offered under the deferred
81 compensation fund for the employees of the state of Missouri
82 shall be made available at the discretion of the board.
83 [5.] 8. The board and employees of the Missouri state
84 employees' retirement system shall be immune from suit and
85 shall not be subject to any claim or liability associated
86 with any administrative actions or decisions made by the
87 commission with regard to the deferred compensation program
88 prior to the transfer made to the board under section
89 105.910.
90 [6.] 9. The board and employees of the system shall
91 not be liable for the investment decisions made or not made
92 by participating employees as long as the board acts with
93 the same skill, prudence, and diligence in the selection and
94 monitoring of providers of investment products, education,
95 advice, or any default investment option, under the
96 circumstances then prevailing that a prudent person acting
97 in a similar capacity and familiar with those matters would
98 use in the conduct of a similar enterprise with similar aims.
99 [7.] 10. The system shall be immune from suit and
100 shall not be subject to any claim or liability associated
101 with the administration of the deferred compensation fund by
102 the board and employees of the system.
103 [8.] 11. Beginning on or after September 1, 2011, if a
104 participant under the deferred compensation plan or the plan
105 established under section 105.927 is married on the date of
106 his or her death, the participant's surviving spouse shall
107 be automatically designated as the primary beneficiary under
108 both plans, unless the surviving spouse consented in

SB 1054 15
109 writing, witnessed by a notary public, to allow the
110 participant to designate a nonspouse beneficiary. As used
111 in this subsection, "surviving spouse" means the spouse as
112 defined pursuant to section 104.012 to whom the participant
113 is lawfully married on the date of death of the participant,
114 provided that a former spouse shall be treated as the
115 surviving spouse of the participant to the extent provided
116 under a judgment, decree, or order that relates to child
117 support, alimony payments, or marital property rights made
118 under Missouri domestic relations law that creates or
119 recognizes the existence of such former spouse's right to
120 receive all or a portion expressed as a stated dollar amount
121 or specific percentage stated in integers of the benefits
122 payable from such plan upon the death of the participant.
123 This subsection shall not apply to beneficiary designations
124 made prior to September 1, 2011.
125 [9.] 12. The board may adopt and amend plan documents
126 to change the terms and conditions of the deferred
127 compensation plan and the plan established under section
128 105.927 that are consistent with federal law.
✓